Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 1. Public Officers; General Provisions

§ 25-1-1.
Length of terms.

The term of office of all officers, not otherwise provided for by law, shall be four (4) years and until their successors shall be duly qualified.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 11; 1857, ch. 6, art § 183; 1871, § 307; 1880, § 396; 1892, § 3049; 1906, § 3456; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2794; 1930, § 2881; 1942, § 4026.

§ 25-1-3.
Date terms begin for state officers, except the governor.

The term of office of all state officers elected at a general election for that purpose, except the Governor, shall commence on the Thursday next after it shall be ascertained and determined by the House of Representatives who shall have been elected to the respective offices, as provided in Sections 140 and 143 of the Constitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 398; 1892, § 3050; 1906, § 3457; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2795; 1930, § 2882; 1942, § 4027; Laws, 1973, ch. 352, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 387, eff from and after November 2, 1982 (date of approval by the state electorate of amendment to section 140, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, as proposed by Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 517 [ch. 621, Laws, 1982]).

§ 25-1-5.
Date terms begin for district, county, and beat officers.

The term of office of all officers elected at such election for any district office, in a district composed of more than one county, or any county office, or any office of a subdivision of a county shall commence on the first Monday of January next succeeding the election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 396; 1892, § 3051; 1906, § 3458; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2796; 1930, § 2883; 1942, § 4028.

§ 25-1-7.
Vacancy in office.

If any person elected or appointed to any state, state district, levee board, county, county district, or municipal office shall fail to qualify as required by law on or before the day of the commencement of his term of office, or for any cause any such officer shall hold over after his regular term of office expires under the authority given him to hold over until his successor is appointed or elected and qualified, a vacancy in such office shall occur thereby and it shall be filled in the manner prescribed by law, as provided by Section 103 of the Constitution for filling vacancies in such offices, unless the failure to qualify arises from there being no officer to approve the bond of such officer-elect, and except the Governor-elect when the Legislature fixes by resolution the time of his installation. This section shall not be applicable to any coroner who fails to qualify as provided in Section 19-21-105.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art. 196; 1871, § 319; 1880, § 400; 1892, § 3052; 1906, § 3459; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2797; 1930, § 2884; 1942, § 4029; Laws, 1924, ch. 230; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-9.
Oath of office taken.

The oath of office may be taken by all officers before any person authorized by law to administer an oath.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 27 (2); 1857, ch. 6, arts 184, 185; 1871, § 308; 1880, § 401; 1892, § 3053; 1906, § 3460; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2798; 1930, § 2885; 1942, § 4030.

§ 25-1-11.
Oath of office filed.

The oath of office of all state officers, and of all officers elected or appointed for any district composed of more than one county, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state; but the oath of office of the circuit judges, chancellors, and district attorneys may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court where such officer shall first attend to discharge the duties of his office. The oath of office of all officers whose duties are confined within the limits of the county in which they are elected shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, arts 184, 185; 1871, § 308; 1880, § 402; 1892, § 3054; 1906, § 3461; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2799; 1930, § 2886; 1942, § 4031.

§ 25-1-13.
State officials to make guaranty or surety bonds.

The state officials hereinafter named shall give bond in the penalty specified for each, with surety by one or more guaranty or surety companies authorized to do business in the state. Said bonds shall be approved by the Governor and commissioner of insurance and, when so approved, shall be filed and recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

The bond of the auditor of public accounts shall be for Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00); the state treasurer, One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00); the land commissioner, Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00); each of the public service commissioners, Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00); director of the feed and fertilizer division, department of agriculture and commerce, Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00); assistant secretary of state, Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00); state forester, Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00); sergeant of the guard of penitentiary, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); dispatch sergeant of the state penitentiary, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

The official bonds of all other state officers shall continue and remain as to amounts thereof as now fixed elsewhere by law, but said bonds shall be subject to the provisions stated herein for sureties, approval, filing, and premium payment unless otherwise specifically provided.

Premiums paid on all bonds under the provisions of this section shall be paid out of the state treasury upon warrant of the auditor, which shall be issued upon the approval of the bonds as herein provided; provided, however, that the said premiums shall be at the lowest rate obtainable. If from any cause such guaranty or surety bond or bonds cannot be obtained in whole or in part because of refusal of said guaranty or surety companies, at a reasonable rate in the judgment of the insurance commissioner or for other cause, to make such bond or bonds, upon certificate of the commissioner of insurance to that effect, the officer or officers having thus been unable to make a bond or bonds may make such bond with personal or individual surety in the required penalty, to be approved by the Governor and filed and recorded as directed herein, together with the certificate of the commissioner of insurance attached to the bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3462; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2800; 1930, § 2887; 1942, § 4032; Laws, 1902, ch. 53; Laws, 1908, ch. 191.

§ 25-1-15.
Conditions of official bonds; new bonds to be secured every four years.

The bonds of all public officers required to give individual bond shall be conditioned in the following form, to wit:

“Whereas, the above bound A B was duly elected (or appointed) to the office of_______________on the_______________day of_______________ , for the term of_______________years from the_______________day of_______________ ; therefore, if he shall faithfully perform all the duties of said office during his continuance therein, then the above obligation to be void.”

A new bond in the amount required by law shall be secured at the beginning of each new term of office or every four (4) years, whichever is less.

The bonds of all public employees required to give individual bond shall be conditioned in the following form, to wit:

“Whereas, the above bound A B was duly employed (or appointed) to the position of_______________on the_______________day of_______________ ; therefore, if he shall faithfully perform all the duties of said position during his continuance therein, then the above obligation to be void.”

A new bondin an amount not less than that required by law shall be secured uponemployment and coverage shall continue by the securing of a new bondevery four (4) years concurrent with the normal election cycle ofthe Governor or with the normal election cycle of the local governmentapplicable to the employee.

A failure to observe the form herein prescribed shall not vitiate any official bond; and all official bonds shall be valid and binding in whatever form they may be taken, except so far as they may be conditioned for the performance of acts in violation of the laws or policy of the state. Whether in the proper penalty or without any penalty, whether correct or incorrect in its recitals as to the term of office or otherwise, whether properly payable, whether approved by the proper officer or not approved by any, or if irregular in any other respect, such bond, if delivered as the official bond of the officer or employee and serving as such, shall be obligatory on everyone who subscribed it for the purpose of making the official bond of such officer or employee to the full penalty or, if it has no penalty, to the full penalty of the bond which might have been required.

All blanket bonds given on positions of public employment shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of all the duties of the positions covered and insured by said blanket bond. A new bond in an amount not less than that required by law for public employees shall be secured at the beginning of each new term of office of the public or appointed official by whom they are employed, if applicable, or at least every four (4) years concurrent with the normal election cycle of the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 12 (3); 1857, ch. 6, art 186; 1871, § 309; 1880, § 403; 1892, § 3055; 1906, § 3463; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2801; 1930, § 2888; 1942, § 4033; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-1-17.
Official bonds payable to state.

The bonds of all public officers and public employees required to give bond shall be made payable to the state, and shall be put in suit in the name of the state for the use and benefit of any person injured by the breach thereof. Such bonds shall not be void on the first recovery, but may be put in suit from time to time by any party injured by the breach thereof, until the whole penalty shall be recovered.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 188; 1871, § 311; 1880, § 404; 1892, § 3056; 1906, § 3464; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2802; 1930, § 2889; 1942, § 4034; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-19.
Approval of bonds of county and beat officers.

The bond of the chancery clerk and circuit clerk of each county shall be approved by the board of supervisors of the county. The bond of the members of the board of supervisors of the county shall be approved by the chancery clerk of such county. The bonds of all other county officers and employees, or officers and employees for any district, subdivision, board or commission of a county, including public school districts, shall be approved by the board of supervisors of such county. All the bonds shall be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county, except that the original of the chancery clerk’s bond, after it is recorded, shall be deposited and filed in the office of the clerk of the circuit court.

The bond of any municipal officer or employee required to give bond shall be approved by the governing authority of such municipality. All said bonds shall be filed and recorded in the office of the municipal clerk of said municipality.

The bonds of all other officers and employees, unless otherwise provided by law, shall be approved by and filed with the appointing authority of such officer or employee.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 22 (2); 1857, ch. 6, art 187; 1871, § 310; 1880, §§ 405, 406; 1892, § 3057; 1906, § 3465; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2803; 1930, § 2890; 1942, § 4035; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 471; Laws, 1988, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1988).

§ 25-1-21.
Affidavit of worth.

Each surety, other than a surety company, on the official bond of any public officer or employee shall make affidavit before some officer competent to administer oaths that he is worth a certain sum, to be specified, in land owned and held by him in his own name and right in fee simple, or for life or a term of not less than twenty (20) years, and situated in the county, over and above all legal exemptions and all his debts and liabilities, including the amount of his liability on any other official bond where the term of office for which the same was given has not expired or where it has expired within a period of five (5) years from the date of such affidavit; and such affidavit shall be endorsed on or annexed to the bond.

Said surety shall set forth in such affidavit a full and clear description of the land, the actual cash value thereof, and the amount of any encumbrance thereon, if any.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 187; 1871, § 310; 1880, §§ 407, 408; 1892, §§ 3058, 3059; 1906, §§ 3466, 3467; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 2804, 2805; 1930, §§ 2891, 2892; 1942, §§ 4036, 4037; Laws, 1942, ch. 222; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 4, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-23.
Procedure for determining sufficiency of doubtful bond.

The officers by whom official bonds of public officials and employees are to be approved shall have the right to inspect the land described in the affidavit made by a surety on any such bond, and shall have the right to orally examine the surety and others touching the description and value of such land. If the approving officers shall fail or refuse to approve any such official bond within fifteen (15) days after it is presented to them by any duly elected or appointed officer or employee and such officer or employee is debarred of his office or position by reason of such failure or refusal, the officer or employee thus debarred may, within ten (10) days after the expiration of the said fifteen-day period, appeal to the chancery court of the county, upon giving bond with sufficient sureties in a penalty of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), payable to the state and conditioned that he will perform the decree of the chancery court. The appeal bond, if sufficient, shall be approved by the clerk of the chancery court and forthwith delivered to the officers who have failed or refused to approve the official bond.

When the appeal bond has been approved and delivered to the approving officers, they shall immediately file it, together with the official bond and the affidavits by the sureties that are annexed to it, in the office of the clerk of the chancery court; and the cause shall be immediately entered on the issue docket of the chancery court as a suit in equity in the name of the aggrieved officer or employee, as complainant, and in the names of the approving officers, as defendants, which cause shall then be at issue and shall be a preference case. The controversy shall be tried de novo, either in term or in vacation, at a time to be fixed by an order made by the chancellor, and no other or further notice of the trial shall be necessary. The issue shall be the sufficiency vel non of the official bond, and the burden of proof shall be upon the appealing officer or employee.

If the bond be adjudged to be sufficient and the approving officers are still unwilling to approve it, the appealing officer or employee may deliver to the approving officers certified copies of the bond, the affidavits of the sureties annexed to it, and the decree of the chancery court; and he shall thereupon be entitled to have the oath of office administered to him and to occupy the office to which he was theretofore elected or appointed.

If the bond be adjudged to be insufficient, a decree shall be rendered against the appealing officer or employee and the sureties on the appeal bond, requiring them to pay the costs of the proceeding in the chancery court; but such adjudication shall not preclude the appealing officer or employee from furnishing a sufficient bond, and the approval thereof by the approving officers, at any time before another person has been duly elected or appointed to the office or position.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 409; 1892, § 3060; 1906, § 3468; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2806; 1930, § 2893; 1942, § 4038; Laws, 1942, ch. 222; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 5, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-25.
New bond required in certain cases.

In case the sureties or any of them, of any public officer or employee shall permanently remove out of the state or become insolvent, or if from any cause an official bond shall be found insufficient, the Governor in the case of a state officer or employee, and the appropriate governing authority in the case of a local officer or employee, shall notify such officer or employee to appear at a day and place to be named within ten (10) days thereafter, to give a new bond with other sufficient sureties in a penalty equal to that of the former bond and with the like condition, or to show cause why the same should not be required. If such officer or employee shall fail or neglect so to do within a time to be designated, his office or position shall thereby become vacant and he shall cease to discharge any of the duties thereof. If a state officer or employee, the Governor shall cause the vacancy to be filled as in other cases; and, if a local office or employee, the vacancy shall be filled as in other cases of vacancy in local offices. From proceedings under this section there shall be no appeal; and if the officer or employee to be notified be without the state or abscond, he may be notified by publication as defendants in chancery are so notified.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 3 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art 192; 1871, § 315; 1880, § 411; 1892, § 3062; 1906, § 3469; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2807; 1930, § 2894; 1942, § 4039; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-27.
Release of surety on bond of local officer or employee.

In case a surety on any bond of any local officer or employee shall conceive himself to be in danger of suffering by being such surety and shall desire to be relieved therefrom, he may petition the board of supervisors or the municipal governing authority, as the case may be, for relief in the premises. The appropriate local governing authority shall thereupon order that the officer or employee give a new bond with sufficient sureties in a penalty not less than the first bond and conditioned according to law, and notice of such order shall forthwith be given to such officer or employee. Said new bond shall be furnished within such reasonable time as the governing authority may direct, not exceeding thirty (30) days from the date of said order; and on the giving of such bond and the approval thereof by the governing authority, the petitioner shall be discharged from further liability on the bond as to the performances of all official duties after the giving of such new bond. If such officer or employee shall fail or refuse to comply with the order to give a new bond, his office or position shall thereby become vacant and the vacancy shall be filled as in other cases of vacancies in local offices or positions.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 9 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 193; 1871, § 316; 1880, § 412; 1892, § 3063; 1906, § 3470; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2808; 1930, § 2895; 1942, § 4040; Laws, 1922, ch. 237; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-29.
Release of surety on bond of state officer.

In case a surety on any bond of any state officer shall desire to be relieved therefrom, he may petition to the Governor to that purpose and give notice thereof to the officer from whose bond he wishes to be relieved; and the Governor shall also communicate and give notice to such officer. If said officer shall not within such reasonable time as the Governor shall direct, not exceeding thirty (30) days, present a new bond in a penalty not less than the first and conditioned according to law, such office shall be declared vacant by the Governor. On the giving of such new bond and the approval as required by law, the petitioner shall be discharged from further liability on the bond as to the performance of all official duties after the giving of such new bond. In the event such surety shall be relieved, he shall refund to the state the unearned premium on such bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 9 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 193; 1871, § 316; 1880, § 412; 1892, § 3063; 1906, §§ 2385, 3471; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 2809, 4777; 1930, §§ 2896, 4831; 1942, §§ 3989, 4041; Laws, 1896, ch. 51.

§ 25-1-31.
Personal bonds.

All bonds required by law to be made by all public officers and employees shall be made in a surety company, authorized to do business in this state.

Any such officer or employee may make affidavit, such affidavit to include two (2) letters of refusal of such bond by bonding companies licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi, that he has made diligent effort to obtain the surety bond required by this section and was unable to do so. In such event, such officer or employee may make his official bond with two (2) or more personal sureties, qualified as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2897; 1942, § 4042; Laws, 1924, ch. 233; Laws, 1962, ch. 495; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 45; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 9; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 8, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-33.
Premiums on official bonds.

The premiums on all bonds given by public officers and employees shall be paid out of any funds available for such expenditure.

Any authority, board, commission or other public entity created by state law is hereby authorized and empowered to expend such portion of its funds as may be found necessary to pay all premiums on surety bonds drawn in favor of the State of Mississippi, which such public entity may require its employees to furnish for the faithful performance of their duties.

This section is to apply only to the payment of such surety bond premiums as are not now otherwise provided for by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4043; Laws, 1940, ch. 148; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 9, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 25-1-35.
Commission not necessary.

All county officers and officers chosen for any portion or district of a county and all municipal officers and officers chosen for any portion or ward of a municipality, shall be authorized to exercise the duties and functions of the office to which they are elected, after they have received certificates of their election, as provided by law, whether they have received their commissions or not; but such officers shall first give bond, if any, required by law or ordinance, and take the oath of office prescribed by the constitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 12 (3); 1857, ch. 6, art 189; 1871, § 312; 1880, § 414; 1892, § 3064; 1906, § 3472; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2810; 1930, § 2898; 1942, § 4044; Laws, 1972, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1972).

§ 25-1-37.
Acts of de facto officer valid.

The official acts of any person in possession of a public office and exercising the functions thereof shall be valid and binding as official acts in regard to all persons interested or affected thereby, whether such person be lawfully entitled to hold the office or not and whether such person be lawfully qualified or not; but such person shall be liable to all the penalties imposed by law for usurping or unlawfully holding office, or for exercising the functions thereof without lawful right or without being qualified according to law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 194; 1871, § 317; 1880, § 415; 1892, § 3065; 1906, § 3473; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2811; 1930, § 2899; 1942, § 4045.

§ 25-1-39.
Deputy to discharge duty after death of officer.

If any state or county officer shall die having a deputy, the deputy may continue to discharge the duties of the office in the name of the deceased officer as if he had not died, until the vacancy in the office shall be filled according to law. The official bond of the deceased officer and his estate shall be a security for the faithful performance of the duties of the office by the deputy, who shall be subject to all the provisions of law applicable to his principal in his lifetime; and the personal representative of the decedent shall have like remedy against the deputy as the decedent would have if living. Where there are two judicial districts in a county and there be a deputy in each, the deputy of the first district shall discharge the duties of the office under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 26; 1871, § 394; 1880, § 423; 1892, § 3079; 1906, § 3487; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2825; 1930, § 2900; 1942, § 4046.

§ 25-1-41.
Informal bonds valid.

All bonds or recognizances taken by any officer in the discharge of his duty shall be valid and binding on the obligors therein, whether taken in the form prescribed or not, so that the substantial matters required be contained therein; and such bonds shall only be void so far as they may be conditioned for the performance of acts in violation of the law or policy of the state. It shall be lawful to show by parol that any bond or recognizance was taken by an officer in the discharge of his duty, although such fact ought to appear upon the bond or recognizance, or in writing or of record, and do not so appear; and if an officer take a recognizance in a case where he should have taken a bond, it shall bind the parties in the same manner as if it had been authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 201; 1871, § 324; 1880, § 422; 1892, § 3076; 1906, § 3484; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2822; 1930, § 2901; 1942, § 4047.

§ 25-1-43.
Officer not to make contract without authority.

An officer shall not enter into any contract on behalf of the state, or of any county, city, town, or village thereof, without being specially authorized thereto by law or by an order of the board of supervisors or municipal authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 23; 1857, ch. 6, art 195; 1871, § 318; 1880, § 416; 1892, § 3066; 1906, § 3474; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2812; 1930, § 2902; 1942, § 4048.

§ 25-1-45.
Civil liability for failure to perform duty.

If any county, county district, or municipal officer who has executed bond for the faithful performance of duty shall knowingly or wilfully fail, neglect, or refuse to perform any duty required of him by law or shall violate his official obligations in any respect, the president or, in the absence or disability or default of the president, the vice-president of the board of supervisors in case of a county or county district officer, and the mayor in case of a municipal officer, or any person interested in either case shall cause suit to be brought on the bond of such officer for the recovery of the damages that may have been sustained thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art 62; 1871, § 2890; 1880, § 2757; 1892, § 3067; 1906, § 3475; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2813; 1930, § 2903; 1942, § 4049; Laws, 1886, p 156; Laws, 1959, Ex Sess ch. 22, § 8.

§ 25-1-47.
Defense of public employees and satisfaction of judgment.

Any municipality of the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized and empowered, within the discretion of its governing authorities, to investigate and provide legal counsel for the defense of any claim, demand, or action, whether civil or criminal, made or brought against any state, county, school district, or municipal officer, agent, servant, employee, or appointee as a result of his actions while acting in the capacity of such officer, agent, servant, employee, or appointee; and such municipality is hereby authorized to pay for all costs and expenses incident to such investigation and defense.

Any municipality of this state is hereby authorized and empowered, within the discretion of its governing authorities, to pay and satisfy any negotiated settlement of a claim or any judgment, fine, or penalty which may be made, assessed, or levied by any court against any municipal agent, officer, servant, employee, or appointee as a result of any actions of such municipal agent, officer, servant, employee, or appointee while acting as such.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4049.5; Laws, 1962, 1st Ex Sess ch. 5, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1971, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1971).

§ 25-1-49.
Seller may recover claim unlawfully brought by an officer.

If any county officer or his deputy shall unlawfully purchase or become interested in any certificate or claim of any kind payable out of the county treasury or in any witness certificate issued in a civil case, the person selling any such claim or certificate may recover the face value thereof of such officer on his official bond; and he shall not be required to account for what he received when he sold.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 1825, 2759; 1892, § 3068; 1906, § 3476; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2814; 1930, § 2904; 1942, § 4050.

§ 25-1-51.
Confiscated property: prohibited acquisition; disposition by sheriff; subsequent recovery.

No law enforcement officer, conservation officer, or other person charged with the duty and responsibility of enforcing the statutory laws of this state or any municipality herein, whether employed full time or part time in such capacity, or any member of his or her household can knowingly own, acquire, bid upon, or otherwise participate as a purchaser or prospective purchaser, either directly or indirectly, at a sale concerning any real, personal, or mixed property which has been confiscated and is being sold, or has been sold, or is subject to being sold pursuant to the laws and statutes of this state. All officers seizing any property shall turn the same over to the sheriff of the county in which said property was seized. All real, personal, or mixed properties confiscated under authority of law and subject to sale as contraband properties shall be sold by the sheriff of the county in which said property was confiscated or is stored, after the sheriff shall first have given public notice by publication for not less than one (1) week in a newspaper published in said county or, if no newspaper is published in said county, said notice shall be published not less than one (1) time in a newspaper having general circulation in said county. The published notice shall contain a description of the property and other pertinent data which the sheriff may deem necessary and proper in compliance with this section. The cost of public notice shall be charged against and added to the cost of the property advertised and sold by virtue of said notice. The net proceeds of all such property sold shall be deposited in the county general fund within the manner provided by law. The sheriff shall keep a public record of all property seized, the disposition thereof, and the proceeds from the sale thereof.

The failure of the sheriff to sell any property seized by him or turned over to him within ninety (90) days and any violation of the above paragraph by such prohibited person, or any other person acting for or in behalf of such prohibited person, shall be deemed to be a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), which fine shall be subject to collection from such prohibited person’s bondsmen if such prohibited person be under bond and fails to pay said assessed fine when it shall have become final and collectible.

In addition thereto, upon a showing in an action begun not later than one (1) year from the date of the legal sale of the confiscated property that such prohibited person has knowingly acquired title to such confiscated property in violation of paragraph (1) hereof, the owner of such property at the time it was confiscated, or his or her heirs, legatees, administrator, or executor shall be immediately entitled to the return of such property; and the sum paid therefor by such prohibited person, or in his or her behalf, shall be forfeited. The sum so forfeited shall be applied in the same manner as it would be applied had the confiscated property been sold to or acquired by other than such prohibited person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4050.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 614, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 25-1-53.
Nepotism prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person elected, appointed or selected in any manner whatsoever to any state, county, district or municipal office, or for any board of trustees of any state institution, to appoint or employ, as an officer, clerk, stenographer, deputy or assistant who is to be paid out of the public funds, any person related by blood or marriage within the third degree, computed by the rule of the civil law, to the person or any member of the board of trustees having the authority to make such appointment or contract such employment as employer. This section shall not apply to any employee who shall have been in said department or institution prior to the time his or her kinsman, within the third degree, became the head of said department or institution or member of said board of trustees; and this section shall not apply to any person seeking appointment as an election worker who has served as an election worker in the election immediately preceding the commencement of a term of office as an election commissioner by his kinsman within the third degree. The provision herein contained shall not apply in the instance of the employment of physicians, nurses or medical technicians by governing boards of charity hospitals or other public hospitals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2905; 1942, § 4051; Laws, 1926, ch. 170; Laws, 1975, ch. 333; Laws, 1994, ch. 627, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 25-1-55.
Penalty for nepotism.

Any person violating the provisions of Section 25-1-53 shall forfeit to the State of Mississippi, and shall be liable on his official bond for, an amount equal to the sum of all moneys paid to any person appointed or employed in violation of the provisions aforesaid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2906; 1942, § 4052; Laws, 1926, ch. 170.

§ 25-1-57.
Undated or postdated resignations.

Whenever any appointment or employment of an officer or employee of the State of Mississippi or any agency, department, or institution thereof, shall by law require confirmation by the Mississippi State Senate, no officer or employee of the state, or any other person, shall take, require, accept, or otherwise obtain as a condition of appointment or employment an undated or postdated resignation from a person to be appointed as an officer or employee of the state or any agency, department, or institution thereof. Any such resignation accepted, taken, or obtained contrary to the provisions hereof shall be null and void and of no effect, unless the Mississippi State Senate shall have been advised of the existence and content of any undated or postdated resignation and consented thereto at the time of its confirmation of the appointment or employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4052.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 385.

§ 25-1-59.
Vacancy by removal or default.

If any state, district, county, county district, or municipal officer during the term of his office shall remove out of the state, district, county, or municipality for which he was elected or appointed, such office shall thereby become vacant and the vacancy be supplied as by law directed. If any person who has been or shall be a collector or holder of public money is elected to either branch of the Legislature or to any office of profit or trust, and shall not have accounted for and paid into the treasury all sums for which he may be accountable on or before the day of the meeting of the Legislature to which he shall be chosen or the time for the commencement of his term of office, the seat of such person in the Legislature or the office to which he was elected shall be forthwith vacated thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art. 25; 1871, § 393; 1880, § 153; 1892, § 3070; 1906, § 3478; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2816; 1930, § 2908; 1942, § 4054.

§ 25-1-61.
Legal residence of state officers.

All public officers of this state who are required to, or who for official reasons, remove from the county of their actual household and residence to another county of this state for the purpose of performing the duties of their office shall be deemed in law in all respects to be householders and residents of the county from which they so remove, unless such officer elects to become an actual householder and resident of the county to which he removed for official causes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2909; 1942, § 4055; Laws, 1926, ch. 175.

§ 25-1-63.
Defaulting officers published.

If any state, state district, county, county district, or other public officer who is required by law to make any report to or settlement with another officer, or in any manner to account with such officer, shall fail to make the report or settlement or to account within ten (10) days after the date on which such report, settlement, or accounting should be made or had or within such reasonable extended time, not exceeding thirty (30) days, as such other officer in a proper case may allow, the fact of such default shall be published by the officer to or with whom the report, settlement, or accounting should be made or had in a newspaper published in the county of the defaulter’s residence, if there be one so published willing to make the publication, and, if not, then in one published at the capital. If any officer to or with whom any such defaulter should report, settle, or account shall fail to make such publication within fifty (50) days after the date of the original default, any citizen who is not a surety of the defaulter may bring an action against the officer so failing to publish the defaulter, personally or on his bond, and shall recover all damages to such citizen and a penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); and, to recover the penalty, it shall not be necessary to show any damages, provided that only one (1) penalty shall be recovered. Two Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($250.00) of the penalty, in the case of a state or state district officer, shall be paid into the state treasury, and in case of a county or county district officer, into the county treasury, and the other half to the person suing. It shall be the duty of the district attorney to bring all such suits.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3071; 1906, § 3479; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2817; 1930, § 2910; 1942, § 4056; Laws, 1916, ch. 226.

§ 25-1-65.
Expense of publication.

The expense of publishing such defaulters shall be paid out of the county treasury on the allowance of the board of supervisors in the case of a county or county district officer, and in the case of a state or state district officer, out of the state treasury, as other contingent expenses are paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3072; 1906, § 3480; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2818; 1930, § 2911; 1942, § 4057.

§ 25-1-67.
Public moneys to be promptly paid by legal representatives.

It is the duty of the legal representative of every tax collector or other officer who shall die having public money in his hands to promptly pay the same over to the proper authorities. Nothing herein contained shall in any manner vary or affect the liability of such officer or his bondsmen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3078; 1906, § 3486; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2824; 1930, § 2912; 1942, § 4058.